North Carolina statutes. Chapter 134A. Youth Services. [Repealed]
§§ 134A-1 through 134A-39.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 1(a), effective January 1, 1999.

Cross References.

As to the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, see G.S. 143B-800 et seq.

Editor’s Note.

The following sections were formerly repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 627, s. 5:
G.S. 134A-3 through 134A-5, 134A-7, 134A-10 through 14.
The following sections were formerly repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 815, s. 3:
G.S. 134A-18, 134A-19, 134A-23, 134A-24, 134A-27, 134A-28.